Vermont statutes. Title 23 Motor Vehicles
Subchapter 1. Snowmobiles
§ 3207d.
Permissive inferences.

Upon the trial of any civil or criminal action or proceeding arising out of acts alleged to have been committed by a person while operating, attempting to operate, or in actual physical control of a snowmobile on any lands, waters, or public highways of this State, the person’s alcohol concentration shall give rise to the following permissive inferences:

If the person’s alcohol concentration at that time was less than 0.08, such fact shall not give rise to any presumption or permissive inference that the person was or was not under the influence of alcohol, but such fact may be considered with other competent evidence in determining whether the person was under the influence of alcohol.

If the person’s alcohol concentration at that time was 0.08 or more, it shall be a permissive inference that the person was under the influence of alcohol in violation of subdivision 3207a(a)(2) or (3) of this title.

If the person’s alcohol concentration at any time within two hours of the alleged offense was 0.10 or more, it shall be a permissive inference that the person was under the influence of alcohol in violation of subdivision 3207a(a)(2) or (3) of this title.

HISTORY:

Added

1993, No. 234

(Adj. Sess.), § 10, eff. Nov. 1, 1994; amended

2017, No. 83

, § 161(4).

§ 3207e.
Refusal to submit to test.

If the person refuses to submit to an evidentiary test it shall not be given, but the refusal may be introduced as evidence in a criminal proceeding.

HISTORY:

Added

1993, No. 234

(Adj. Sess.), § 11, eff. Nov. 1, 1994.

§ 3207f.
Persons under 21; alcohol concentration of 0.02 or more.

A person under the age of 21 who operates, attempts to operate, or is in actual physical control of a snowmobile on any lands, waters, or public highways of this State when the person’s alcohol concentration is 0.02 or more commits a civil traffic violation subject to the jurisdiction of the Judicial Bureau and subject to the following sanctions:

For a first violation, the person’s privilege to operate a snowmobile on any lands, waters, or public highways of this State shall be suspended for six months and until the person complies with section 1209a of this title.

For a second or subsequent violation, the person’s privilege to operate a snowmobile on any lands, waters, or public highways of this State shall be suspended until the person reaches the age of 21 or for one year, whichever is longer, and complies with section 1209a of this title.

Notwithstanding the provisions in subsection (a) of this section to the contrary, a person’s privilege to operate that has been suspended under this section shall not be reinstated until the Commissioner has received satisfactory evidence that the provider of the therapy program has been paid in full.

If a law enforcement officer has reasonable grounds to believe that a person is violating this section, the officer may request the person to submit to a breath test using a preliminary screening device approved by the Commissioner of Health. Notwithstanding any provisions to the contrary in sections 1202 and 1203 of this title:

the results of the test shall be admissible evidence in a proceeding under this section; and

there shall be no statutory right to counsel prior to the administration of the test.

A refusal to submit to an evidentiary test shall be considered a violation of this section.

In a proceeding under this section, if there was at any time within two hours of operating, attempting to operate, or being in actual physical control of a snowmobile on the lands, waters, or public highways of this State an alcohol concentration of 0.02 or more, it shall be a rebuttable presumption that the person’s alcohol concentration was 0.02 or more at the time of operating, attempting to operate, or being in actual physical control.

The alcohol program required under this section shall be administered by the Department of Health’s Division of Substance Use Programs and shall take into consideration any particular treatment needs of operators under 21 years of age.

A charge of violating this section shall not bar prosecution for any crime, including a prosecution under section 3207a of this title.

HISTORY:

Added

1997, No. 57

, § 6, eff. Sept. 1, 1997; amended

1997, No. 121

(Adj. Sess.), § 28;

2021, No. 115

(Adj. Sess.), § 6, effective July 1, 2022.

§ 3208.
Administration and enforcement.

The Commissioner of Motor Vehicles shall administer the provisions of this subchapter, except as otherwise provided, and may adopt rules prescribing forms and procedures for application and registration as necessary to carry its provisions into effect.

The Secretary of Natural Resources shall provide to the Agency of Transportation a list of public lands, public waters and natural areas on or over which a snowmobile may not be operated. The information provided shall be incorporated in the booklet made available pursuant to subsection (c) of this section.

This subchapter and rules adopted under this subchapter, together with the list provided by the Secretary of Natural Resources, shall be printed in booklet form and made available to the public by the Agency of Transportation.

The provisions of this subchapter and rules adopted pursuant to this subchapter shall be enforced by law enforcement officers as defined in section 3302 of this title in accordance with the provisions of 4 V.S.A. chapter 29. Testimony of a witness as to the existence of navigation or snowmobile control signs, signals, or markings shall be prima facie evidence that such control, sign, signal, or marking existed pursuant to a lawful statute, regulation, or ordinance and that the defendant was lawfully required to obey a direction of such device.

Law enforcement officers as defined in section 3302 of this title may conduct safety inspections on snowmobiles stopped for other snowmobile law violations on the Statewide Snowmobile Trail System. Safety inspections may also be conducted in a designated area by law enforcement officials. A designated area shall be warned solely by blue lights either on a stationary snowmobile parked on a trail or on a cruiser parked at a roadside trail crossing.

HISTORY:

Added

1983, No. 212

(Adj. Sess.), § 2; amended

1993, No. 234

(Adj. Sess.), § 12, eff. June 21, 1994;

2003, No. 116

(Adj. Sess.), § 8;

2017, No. 71

, § 19;

2019, No. 131

(Adj. Sess.), § 234.

§ 3209.
Defacing manufacturer identification and serial numbers.

A person shall not willfully change or attempt to change, or tamper with, obliterate, deface, or in any manner interfere with the original or assigned motor number or manufacturer’s serial number of any snowmobile.

HISTORY:

Added

1983, No. 212

(Adj. Sess.), § 2; amended

1993, No. 234

(Adj. Sess.), § 13, eff. Nov. 1, 1994.

§ 3209a.
Placing and defacing trail signs.

A landowner or VAST may place snowmobile trail signs, markers, or posters on or adjacent to a snowmobile trail maintained by VAST if the landowner has granted permission for use of the land and for placement of the signs, markers, or posters.

A person may not remove, deface, alter, or destroy trail signs, markers, or posters erected pursuant to subsection (a) of this section without the permission of VAST.

The provisions of subsection (b) of this section shall not prevent a landowner from removing signs, markers, or posters that have been erected without permission of the landowner or that remain on the property after permission has been withdrawn.

HISTORY:

Added

1993, No. 234

(Adj. Sess.), § 14, eff. Nov. 1, 1994.

§ 3210.
Municipal ordinances.

Municipalities shall have the power to adopt ordinances pursuant to 24 V.S.A. chapter 59 for the purpose of regulating the time, manner, and location of operation of snowmobiles within their limits, provided such ordinances do not controvert the provisions of this subchapter.

HISTORY:

Added

1983, No. 212

(Adj. Sess.), § 2.

§ 3211.
Crashes; duty to stop and report.

The operator of a snowmobile who has caused or is involved in a crash resulting in injury to any person or property, other than the snowmobile then under his or her control, shall immediately stop and render such assistance as may be reasonably necessary. The operator shall give his or her name, residence, registration number, and the name of the owner of the snowmobile to the party whose person or property is injured.

The operator of a snowmobile involved in a crash resulting in death or injury to any person, or damage to property other than the snowmobile he or she is operating, in excess of $500.00, shall immediately notify a law enforcement officer and file a report of the incident with the Commissioner within 72 hours, on forms prescribed by the Commissioner.

HISTORY:

Added

1983, No. 212

(Adj. Sess.), § 2; amended

1993, No. 234

(Adj. Sess.), § 15, eff. Nov. 1, 1994.

§ 3212.
Attempting to elude a law enforcement officer.

An operator of a snowmobile shall bring the snowmobile to a stop and not attempt to elude a law enforcement officer when signaled to do so by a law enforcement officer wearing insignia identifying him or her as such, or operating a law enforcement vehicle or snowmobile sounding a siren or displaying a flashing blue or blue and white signal lamp.

HISTORY:

Added

1983, No. 212

(Adj. Sess.), § 2; amended

1993, No. 234

(Adj. Sess.), § 16, eff. Nov. 1, 1994.

§ 3213.
Proof of payment of tax.

No license, permits, registration, or similar authorization to own or operate any snowmobile shall be issued under this subchapter until proof of payment of or exemption from the tax imposed by 32 V.S.A. chapter 233 has been established in the manner prescribed by the Commissioner of Taxes.

A current or expired registration certificate or other acceptable proof from the state or province of residence shall suffice as proof of payment of the tax referred to in subsection (a) of this section for persons applying for nonresident registration in this State.

HISTORY:

Added

1983, No. 212

(Adj. Sess.), § 2; amended

1987, No. 126

(Adj. Sess.), § 3;

1993, No. 234

(Adj. Sess.), § 17, eff. June 21, 1994.

§ 3214.
Allocation of fees and penalties; liability insurance; authority to contract for law enforcement services.

The amount of $5.00 from the sale of every resident and nonresident snowmobile registration shall be allocated to the Transportation Fund. The balance of fees and penalties collected under this subchapter, except interest, shall be remitted to the Agency of Natural Resources, which may retain for its use up to $11,500.00 during each fiscal year for oversight of the Statewide Snowmobile Trail Program, and the remainder shall be allocated to VAST for:

Development and maintenance of the Statewide Snowmobile Trail Program (SSTP).

Procuring trails’ liability insurance in accordance with subsection (b) of this section.

Contracting for law enforcement services with any constable, sheriff’s department, municipal police department, the Department of Public Safety, or the Department of Fish and Wildlife to ensure compliance with the provisions of this chapter. The allocation for snowmobile law enforcement services shall be an amount equal to $5.00 from the sale of every resident and nonresident snowmobile registration. If this allocation for law enforcement services is not fully expended, the unexpended amount carried forward may be used to purchase capital equipment to aid law enforcement in the provision of services. VAST shall include proposed spending on law enforcement services and on capital equipment as part of the annual expenditure plan required by section 3215 of this chapter. The Departments of Public Safety and of Fish and Wildlife are authorized to contract with VAST to provide law enforcement services.

VAST shall purchase a trails’ liability insurance policy in the amount of $1,000,000.00. The State of Vermont shall be named an additional insured. The policy shall extend to all VAST affiliated snowmobile clubs and their respective employees and agents to provide for trails’ liability coverage for development and maintenance of the Statewide Snowmobile Trail Program, including groomer use and operation. The Office of the Secretary of Administration shall assist VAST with the procurement of trails liability and other related insurance.

Nothing contained in this section shall authorize or create any cause of action to accrue or to be maintained against the State of Vermont.

Any fees and penalties allocated pursuant to subsection (a) of this section shall not revert but shall be available until spent. Any accrued interest shall be deposited in the Transportation Fund.

HISTORY:

Added

1983, No. 212

(Adj. Sess.), § 2; amended

1987, No. 89

, § 313;

1987, No. 126

(Adj. Sess.), § 4;

1993, No. 234

(Adj. Sess.), § 18, eff. June 21, 1994:

1995, No. 63

, § 214, eff. May 4, 1995;

2005, No. 215

(Adj. Sess.), § 281;

2009, No. 50

, § 60;

2011, No. 164

(Adj. Sess.), § 10;

2013, No. 50

, § E.101.5;

2013, No. 189

(Adj. Sess.), § 23.

§ 3215.
Expenditure plan.

VAST shall prepare a plan for the expenditure of funds for the SSTP that are allocated in section 3214 of this title and shall submit this plan to the Governor’s Snowmobile Council for its review, advice, and consent. The plan shall include provisions for:

administration of the program;

trail development and maintenance including contractual arrangements where appropriate; and

periodic audits if requested by the Council or Auditor of Accounts.

HISTORY:

Added

1983, No. 212

(Adj. Sess.), § 2; amended

1993, No. 234

(Adj. Sess.), § 19, eff. June 21, 1994;

2005, No. 93

(Adj. Sess.), § 81.

§ 3216.
Governor’s Snowmobile Council.

The Governor’s Snowmobile Council is created. The members of the Council shall consist of:
(a) (1) The Governor’s Snowmobile Council is created. The members of the Council shall consist of:

the President or designee of VAST;

the Secretary of Natural Resources or designee;

the Commissioner of Fish and Wildlife or designee;

the Commissioner of Public Safety or designee;

the Commissioner of Motor Vehicles or designee;

the Commissioner of Forests, Parks and Recreation or designee;

the President of the Vermont Sheriffs’ Association or designee;

the President of the Vermont Chiefs of Police Association or designee;

five members appointed by the Governor to represent geographic regions of the State;

one member of the House of Representatives appointed by the Speaker of the House; and

one member of the Senate appointed by the Committee on Committees.

The Chair shall be appointed by the Governor.

The Council shall serve the following functions:

to review, advise, and consent on development of the annual plan for the expenditure of funds for the Statewide Snowmobile Trail Program;

to review and advise the Governor and General Assembly on matters relating to snowmobiling in Vermont, including environmental and community impacts, development of snowmobile trails, ways to encourage snowmobile traffic in those communities that seek more traffic and control the growth in municipalities that desire less traffic, adequacy of parking areas, carrying capacity of trails, State laws and rules affecting snowmobilers, and promoting snowmobiling in this State;

to help coordinate efforts of VAST and State and federal agencies, private industry, and nonprofit organizations in meeting the needs of snowmobilers in Vermont;

to perform any other duties or functions regarding snowmobiling assigned by the Governor; and

to ensure that municipal legislative bodies are given advance notice and an opportunity for input before trail or parking lot expansion takes place in the community.

The members appointed by the Governor shall serve for two-year terms and all others shall serve the term of their office.

The Council may designate technical work groups, composed of representatives of appropriate public agencies, private organizations, and individuals, to assist in the collection, study, and evaluation of information and to advise the Council on particular issues.

The appointed members of the Council and the President or designee of VAST shall be entitled to compensation at the rate provided for in

32 V.S.A. § 1010

. Expenditures shall be paid from snowmobile funds appropriated to the Agency of Natural Resources for administration of the program.
(e) (1) The appointed members of the Council and the President or designee of VAST shall be entitled to compensation at the rate provided for in

32 V.S.A. § 1010

. Expenditures shall be paid from snowmobile funds appropriated to the Agency of Natural Resources for administration of the program.

Legislative members shall be entitled to compensation and reimbursement of expenses as provided for by

2 V.S.A. § 23

.

Technical work group members shall not be entitled to compensation or reimbursement of expenses.

The Council is attached to the Office of the Secretary of Natural Resources for administrative support.

HISTORY:

Added

1983, No. 212

(Adj. Sess.), § 2; amended

1987, No. 76

, § 18;

1993, No. 234

(Adj. Sess.), § 21, eff. Nov. 1, 1994;

1999, No. 20

, § 9;

2001, No. 126

(Adj. Sess.), § 7, eff. June 12, 2002;

2013, No. 19

, § 1, eff. May 7, 2013;

2021, No. 20

, § 252.

§ 3217.
Liability insurance; trail maintenance.

The State may extend coverage of its liability insurance to parties under contract with the Department of Forests, Parks and Recreation for development and maintenance of the snowmobile trail system. Insurance coverage shall match the State’s current financial liability limits and shall be limited to those activities defined by the development and maintenance contract. The Secretary of Administration shall pay for this extended coverage with funds from snowmobile registration receipts.

HISTORY:

Added

1987, No. 126

(Adj. Sess.), § 5; amended

2013, No. 50

, § E.101.6.

§ 3218.
Law enforcement officer’s testimony.

In any proceeding under this subchapter, a law enforcement officer’s testimony that he or she is certified pursuant to

20 V.S.A. § 2358

shall be prima facie evidence of that fact.

HISTORY:

Added

1999, No. 20

, § 12.

§ 3219.
Administrative penalties.

The Commissioner may impose an administrative penalty of not more than $250.00 against VAST or its agent for each violation of this subchapter or the rules adopted thereunder. A penalty arising from a single violation may be assessed against VAST or its agent, as may be appropriate, but not against both.

Each violation is a separate and distinct offense, and, in the case of a continuing violation, each day’s continuance may be deemed a separate and distinct offense. In no event shall the maximum penalty imposed for a continuing offense exceed $500.00.

The Commissioner shall adopt rules establishing a schedule of administrative penalties to be imposed under this section. Penalties shall be based on the severity and frequency of the violation.

VAST or its agent shall be given notice and opportunity for a hearing on any alleged violation. Service of the notice shall be sent by first-class mail. The notice shall include the following:

a factual description of the alleged violation;

a reference to the particular statute or rule allegedly violated;

the amount of the proposed administrative penalty; and

a warning that the right to a hearing will be deemed waived and a penalty will be imposed if no hearing is requested within 15 days from the date of the notice, and that failure to pay a penalty may result in suspension or cancellation of the privilege of issuing registrations pursuant to the provisions of section 3204 of this title by VAST or its agent.

When VAST or its agent receives notice under subsection (d) of this section, it shall be deemed to have waived the right to a hearing unless, within 15 days from the date of the notice, a hearing is requested in writing. If the right to a hearing is waived, the Commissioner shall issue a final order finding VAST or its agent in default and imposing the penalty.

The provisions of sections 105, 106, and 107 of this title shall apply to hearings conducted under this section.

The Commissioner may collect an unpaid administrative penalty by filing a civil action in Superior Court or through any other means available to State agencies.

If a penalty is not paid within 60 days after it is imposed, the Commissioner may suspend or cancel the privilege of issuing registrations granted to VAST or its agent under the provisions of section 3204 of this title.

The remedies authorized by this section shall be in addition to any other civil or criminal remedies provided by law for a violation of this subchapter.

All penalties collected under this section shall be deposited in the Transportation Fund.

HISTORY:

Added

2011, No. 164

(Adj. Sess.), § 11.